Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.110.010

Discrimination prohibited.

Article XXXI, section 1, Amendment 61 of the Washington state Constitution requires equal treatment of all citizens, regardless of gender. Recognizing the benefit to our state and nation of equal educational opportunities for all students, discrimination on the basis of gender against any student in the institutions of higher education of Washington state is prohibited.

[ 1989 c 341 s 1.]